Hawaii statutes.
[§264-123]
Authority to assess impact fees; needs assessment study. (a) A county may
assess, impose, levy, collect, and transfer to the department impact fees for
any development pursuant to ordinances adopted under section 46‑142 and
this part, and the department is authorized to receive those funds for state
highway improvements.

(b) Prior to the assessment, imposition, levy,
collection, or transfer to the department of impact fees pursuant to this
section, the director shall approve a needs assessment study that shall
identify the kinds of state highway improvements for which the fees shall be
imposed by the county pursuant to part VIII of chapter 46. [L 2004, c 155, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next